Utah statutes.
58-80-401.   Fees -- Rulemaking authority.
(1)  The division may charge a fee, established under Section 63J-1-504, to
recover the costs of:
(a)  administering the examination described in Section 58-80-203; and
(b)  issuing the certificate described in Subsection 58-80-201(1).
(2)  The division may make rules, pursuant to Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah
Administrative Rulemaking Act, to accomplish the requirements of this chapter.
